Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 4801.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Municipality” shall mean “municipality” as defined in

1 V.S.A. § 126

.

“Legislative branch” shall mean “legislative branch” as defined in subdivision 1751(2) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4802.
Approval of plan.

Every agreement for a union municipal district under this chapter shall be submitted to the Attorney General before being presented to the voters for acceptance or rejection. The Attorney General shall determine whether the agreement is in proper form and compatible with the laws of this State. In the event that the Attorney General fails to notify the joint survey committee provided for in subchapter 2 of this chapter of his or her determination within 30 days after receipt of a copy of the agreement, it shall be deemed to have been approved.

In the event that an agreement for a union municipal district deals in whole or in part with services or facilities over which an officer or agency of the State government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall be submitted to him or her or it, at the time of its submission to the Attorney General. The officer or agency involved may file objections with the Attorney General.

No agreement shall be submitted to the voters unless it has been approved by the Attorney General under subsection (a) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 85f.

§ 4803.
Powers as supplementary.

The powers granted to municipalities by this chapter are supplementary to any other powers heretofore or hereafter granted by any other statute for the same or similar purposes.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.